local/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.az.dix.xml
      <pardef n="ağla/maq__vblex">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ram</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rammı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maram</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>marammı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rsan</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rsanmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsan</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsanmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rıq</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rıqmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>marıq</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>marıqmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rsınız</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rsınızmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsız</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsızmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rlar</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rlarmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazlar</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazlarmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>

    <e lm="oğurlamaq"><i>oğurla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="alqışlamaq"><i>alqışla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ayıblamaq"><i>ayıbla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="başlamaq"><i>başla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bulamaq"><i>bula</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="çatlamaq"><i>çatla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dağlamaq"><i>dağla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dalamaq"><i>dala</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="damcılamaq"><i>damcıla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dolamaq"><i>dola</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="xaşlamaq"><i>xaşla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="xatırlamaq"><i>xatırla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hürmək"><i>hür</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hazırlamaq"><i>hazırla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="xırpalamaq"><i>xırpala</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hoppanmaq"><i>hoppan</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="xorlamaq"><i>xorla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ismarlamaq"><i>ismarla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="şüalamaq"><i>şüala</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ixtiyarlamaq"><i>ixtiyarla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qaralamaq"><i>qarala</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qarışlamaq"><i>qarışla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qarşılamaq"><i>qarşıla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qatlamaq"><i>qatla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qoxlamaq"><i>qoxla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qovalamaq"><i>qovala</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qucaqlamaq"><i>qucaqla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qurulamaq"><i>qurula</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="miyovuldamaq"><i>miyovulda</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="otlamaq"><i>otla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ovxalamaq"><i>ovxala</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="səsə qoymaq"><i>səsə<b/>qoy</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="paralamaq"><i>parala</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="parlamaq"><i>parla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="partlamaq"><i>partla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bəhbəhləmək"><i>bəhbəhlə</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rahatlamaq"><i>rahatla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sıralamaq"><i>sırala</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sığallamaq"><i>sığalla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="suçlamaq"><i>suçla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sulamaq"><i>sula</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mat qalmaq"><i>mat<b/>qal</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tamamlamaq"><i>tamamla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tasarlamaq"><i>tasarla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tovlamaq"><i>tovla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yola salmaq"><i>yola<b/>sal</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yavaşlamaq"><i>yavaşla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zıplamaq"><i>zıpla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zırıldamaq"><i>zırılda</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zorlamaq"><i>zorla</i><par n="ağla/maq__vblex"/></e>
